Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 10.2 Pension Protection Act

36-10.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Pension Protection Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 8.

36-10.2-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of the Rhode Island Pension Protection Act is to provide current, retired and future public employees financial retirement security by codifying procedures that will promote the sustainability and longevity of the state’s retirement systems. The act will implement a fair process to be used to facilitate needed changes in times of fiscal distress.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 8.

36-10.2-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms, unless the context requires a different interpretation, have the following meanings:

“Retirement board” or “board” means the retirement board of the Employees’ Retirement System of the State of Rhode Island as defined in chapter 8 of this title.

“Actuary” means the actuary selected from time to time and employed by the board in accordance with chapter 8 of this title.

“Plan” or “plans” means any plan or plans that are part of the following public retirement systems: the Employees’ Retirement System of Rhode Island (ERS); the Municipal Employees’ Retirement System of Rhode Island (MERS); the Rhode Island State Police Retirement Benefits Trust (SPRBT); and the Rhode Island Judicial Retirement Benefits Trust (JRBT).

“Funded percentage” means the percentage equal to a fraction- the numerator of which is the actuarial value of the plan’s assets, as determined by the actuary, and the denominator of which is the accrued liability of the plan, determined by the actuary using actuarial assumptions approved by the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 8.

36-10.2-4.
Actuarial valuation methodology.

Actuarial accounting methods used by the actuary in determining the funded percentage shall be determined by the board in compliance with all applicable public pension accounting laws, rules and regulations. The actuary or the board shall not, year to year, change actuarial methods for the sole purpose of achieving a more favorable funding or fiscal result. Any actuarial assumptions not determined by the board shall be made by the actuary in good faith and in accordance with accepted actuarial standards.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 8.

36-10.2-5.
Determination of endangered status.

A plan is in endangered status for a plan year if the retirement board determines, in consultation with the plan actuary, that the plan:

(i)

Has a funded percentage of fifty percent (50%) or less;

(ii)

The plan’s funded percentage has decreased for five (5) consecutive plan years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 8.

36-10.2-6.
Annual certification and notice requirements.

Not later than November 1 of each plan year of a plan, the actuary shall certify to the board and the executive director of the retirement system whether or not a plan is in endangered status for such a plan year.

In any case in which the actuary certifies that a plan is in endangered status for a plan year, the executive director of the retirement system shall, not later than thirty (30) business days following the certification, provide notification of the endangered status to the members, beneficiaries, the general assembly, the governor, the general treasurer and any local or municipal employer of a MERS plan determined to be in endangered status. The notification shall also be posted electronically on the retirement board’s website.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 8.

36-10.2-7.
Funding improvement strategy procedure.

In any case in which a plan is in endangered status for a plan year, except for a plan year where a plan is already in a funding improvement period and meeting its scheduled funding targets for the three (3) consecutive prior plan years, a funding improvement strategy shall be implemented not later than June 30 following the date the plan was certified as being in endangered status under §

36-10.2-6

. The plan actuary shall submit preliminary funding improvement strategies including a default strategy as described in subparagraphs (3) and (4) to the board for review not later than January 1 following the date the plan was certified as being in endangered status under §

36-10.2-6

.

The funding improvement strategy shall be formulated to achieve, based on reasonably anticipated experience and reasonable actuarial assumptions, the following requirements:

The plan’s funded percentage shall improve in accordance with paragraph (i) or paragraph (ii), applying the paragraph that produces the greater funded percentage increase for the plan in a ten (10) year period.

As of the close of a ten (10) year funding improvement period, the plan’s funded percentage shall equal or exceed the sum of:

The plan’s funded percentage as of the beginning of the plan year that the actuary initially certified the plan as endangered; plus

Fifty percent (50%) of the difference between eighty percent (80%) and the plan’s funded percentage under paragraph (I); or

The plan’s funded percentage shall improve at the rate of at least one percent (1%) annually until the plan’s funded percentage equals or exceeds eighty percent (80%).

In the event that the state or a local municipality, as the employer of a plan, determines that, based on reasonable actuarial assumptions and upon exhaustion of all reasonable measures, the plan cannot reasonably be expected to meet the guidelines of subdivisions (i) and (ii), then the employer’s legislative governing body shall provide a report to the retirement board, no later than March 1 following the date the plan was certified as being in endangered status under §

36-10.2-6

, explaining why the plan is not reasonably expected to meet the guidelines of subdivisions (i) or (ii) and provide a reasonable funding improvement strategy to emerge from endangered status.

Not later than January 1 following the date the plan was certified as being in endangered status under §

36-10.2-6

, the actuary shall provide to the board, and in the case of MERS plan shall also provide to the impacted local municipality’s legislative governing body, at least five (5) funding improvement strategies but no more than ten (10) funding improvement strategies showing revised benefit structures, revised contribution structures, or both, which, if adopted, may reasonably be expected to enable the plan to meet the applicable requirements found in subparagraph (2).

In addition to any funding improvement strategies provided by the board in subparagraph (3), the board shall include a default funding improvement strategy (“Default A”) that shall show increases in employer and employee contributions under the plan necessary to achieve the applicable requirements found in subsection (2), assuming no amendments to reduce future benefit accruals under the plan.

Not later than April 1 following the date the plan was certified as being in endangered status under §

36-10.2-6

, the board shall submit the “Default A” strategy as described in subparagraph (4) and one additional funding improvement strategy, as selected by the board, to the general assembly.

Not later than June 30 following the date the plan was certified as being in endangered status under §

36-10.2-6

, the general assembly shall select and enact into law one of the two (2) submitted funding improvement strategies. If no funding improvement strategy is approved by the general assembly by June 30, the “Default A” strategy as described in subparagraph (4) shall be enacted into law effective July 1 following the date the plan was certified as being in endangered status under §

36-10.2-6

. “Default A” shall remain in effect until either the actuary certifies under § 36-10.2-6 for a plan year that the plan is no longer in endangered status or the general assembly selects a funding improvement strategy consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any reports and funding strategies submitted to the board pursuant to this section shall be public records.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 8.

36-10.2-8.
Funding improvement period.

The funding improvement period for any funding improvement strategy adopted pursuant to this chapter shall begin on the first day of July immediately after the adoption date of the funding improvement strategy.

The funding improvement period shall be a ten (10) year period unless the actuary certifies under §

36-10.2-6

for a plan year that the plan is no longer in endangered status. In such a case, the funding improvement period shall end as of the close of the preceding plan year.

A plan may not be amended during the funding improvement period so as to be inconsistent with the funding improvement strategy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 8.

36-10.2-9.
Transition period.

Effective for plan years beginning July 1, 2012, any new legislation enacted contemporaneously with this chapter that is expected to improve the funding percentage of such a plan to eighty percent (80%) or greater within a reasonable funding improvement period not to exceed twenty (20) years shall be considered to constitute a funding improvement strategy. The funding improvement period shall be governed by such enacted legislation and shall begin July 1, 2012.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 8.

36-10.2-10.
Severability.

The holding of any section or sections or parts hereof to be void, ineffective, or unconstitutional for any cause shall not be deemed to affect any other section or part hereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 8.